Tennessee, session 114, HB1098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(k)
(1) A person commits an offense who knowingly carries or possesses a
firearm, including a firearm that was privately assembled and does not contain a
serial number or other mark in a manner that conforms with the requirements
imposed on licensed importers and licensed manufacturers of firearms pursuant
to 18 U.S.C. § 923(i), and, at the time of possessing or carrying, is not a citizen of
the United States or a lawful permanent resident, as defined by § 55-50-102.
(2) An offense under subdivision (k)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1098
003134
- 1 -